New Jersey, session 222, S106.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    If the Governor declares a state of emergency pursuant to P.L.1942, c.251 (C.App.A:9-33 et seq.) or public health emergency pursuant to P.L.2005, c.222 (C.26:13-1 et seq.), services provided by the following shall be designated essential and exempt from requirements included in a state of emergency or public health emergency that mandate a business to temporarily close or individual to temporarily isolate: (1)   Individuals and businesses licensed to perform electrical contracting pursuant to P.L.1962, c.162 (C.45:5A-1 et seq.), heating, ventilating, air conditioning and refrigeration contracting pursuant to P.L.2007, c.211 (C.45:16A-1 et seq.) or plumbing pursuant to P.L.1968, c.362 (C.45:14C-1 et seq.); and (2)   Individuals and retail businesses that sell or offer for sale building materials, and other hardware materials, products and implements used for construction or repair. 2.    Upon the declaration of a state of emergency or public health emergency, the Director of the Division of Consumer Affairs is authorized to designate additional professions or occupations licensed by the Division of Consumer Affairs, in addition to those provided in section 1 of this act, as providing essential services and exempt licensees providing these services from requirements included in a state of emergency or public health emergency that mandate a business to temporarily close or individuals to temporarily isolate. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.